Washington statutes.
RCW 44.16.170

Record of proceedings.

Every such committee shall keep a record of its proceedings under the provisions of this chapter, which record shall be signed by the chair or presiding officer of the committee, and the same returned to the legislative body by which the committee was appointed, as a part of the report of such committee.

[ 2009 c 549 s 6013; 1895 c 6 s 16; RRS s 8193.]